Georgia, session 2025_26, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 13 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Capitol Art Standards Commission, is amended in Code Section 45-13-71,
relating to duties and responsibilities of commission, by adding a new paragraph to read as
follows:
- 1 -

LC 39 4805S
"(5.1) To oversee the design, procurement, and placement of a monument honoring the
Honorable Clarence Thomas pursuant to Code Section 50-3-130;"
SECTION 2.
Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state flag, seal,
and other symbols, is amended by adding new articles to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 8
50-3-130.
(a) Subject to the availability of funds, there shall be placed within the Nathan Deal
Judicial Center a monument honoring the Honorable Clarence Thomas.
(b)(1) Such monument shall be designed, procured, and placed by the Capitol Art
Standards Commission, subject to final approval by a monument committee composed
of the following members of the General Assembly:
(A) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives;
(B) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; and
(C) One member from each house of the General Assembly appointed by the
Governor.
(2) The monument committee established pursuant to this subsection shall stand
abolished upon placement of such monument.
(c) No public funds shall be expended for the design or procurement of such monument.
Gifts and donations from private individuals, organizations, or foundations shall be
accepted and expended by the Capitol Art Standards Commission to carry out the
requirements of this Code section.
- 2 -

LC 39 4805S
(d) Such monument shall be procured and placed as soon as practicable but not before the
state has been granted any intellectual property license necessary for the purposes of this
Code section.
ARTICLE 9
50-3-140.
(a) There shall be placed upon the grounds of the state capitol building and upon the
grounds outside the state archives building a marker which commemorates the patriots of
the Revolutionary War, honoring the men and women who helped America achieve
independence. Each such marker shall honor the two-hundred and fiftieth anniversary of
the United States and those who fought for the noble cause of liberty and for a new nation.
(b) Placement location for Revolutionary War Patriots markers provided for in this Code
section shall be subject to approval by the Capitol Arts Standards Commission for
placement upon the grounds of the state capitol building and by the Board of Regents for
the placement of the marker upon the grounds outside the state archives building.
(c) No public funds shall be expended for the design or procurement of the markers
provided for in this Code section. Each such marker shall be placed as soon as practicable."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 3 -